Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-218
Statewide model anonymous reporting protocol for health care providers.

On or before July 1, 2019, the Attorney General shall develop and distribute a statewide model anonymous reporting protocol for use by health care providers as provided in section 28-902. Once developed, the statewide model anonymous reporting protocol shall be maintained by the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice.

Laws 2018, LB1132, § 4.